Utah statutes.
72-11-212.    Passenger ropeways -- Violations -- Order of committee.
(1)  If, after investigation, the committee finds that a violation of this
chapter or any of its rules exists, or that there is a condition in passenger
ropeway construction, operation, or maintenance that endangers the safety of
the public, it shall immediately issue its written order setting forth its
findings, the corrective action to be taken, and setting a reasonable time for
compliance.
(2)  The order shall be served upon the operator involved in the violation
personally or by registered mail at the committee's election.  Return shall be
made as provided in the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.
